Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.150

Inventory of state-owned or leased facilities—Report.

(1) The office of financial management shall develop and maintain an inventory system to account for all facilities owned or leased by state government. At a minimum, the inventory system must include the facility owner, location, type, condition, use data, and size of each facility. In addition, for owned facilities, the inventory system must include the date and cost of original construction and the cost of any major remodeling or renovation. The inventory must be updated by all agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions by June 30th of each year. The office of financial management shall publish a report summarizing information contained in the inventory system for each agency by October 1st of each year, beginning in 2010 and shall submit this report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(2) The inventory required under this subsection must be submitted in a standard format prescribed by the office of financial management.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "facilities" means buildings and other structures with walls and a roof. "Facilities" does not mean roads, bridges, parking areas, utility systems, and other similar improvements to real property.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 302; 2007 c 506 s 7; 1997 c 96 s 2; 1993 c 325 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 506: See note following RCW 43.82.035.

Findings—Purpose—1997 c 96: "The legislature finds that the capital stock of facilities owned by state agencies represents a significant financial investment by the citizens of the state of Washington, and that providing agencies with the tools and incentives needed to adequately maintain state facilities is critically important to realizing the full value of this investment. The legislature also finds that ongoing reporting of facility inventory, condition, and maintenance information by agencies will improve accountability and assist in the evaluation of budget requests and facility management by the legislature and governor. The purpose of this act is to ensure that recent enhancements to facility and maintenance reporting systems implemented by the office of financial management, and a new program created by the *department of general administration to provide maintenance information and technical assistance to state and local agencies, are sustained into the future." [ 1997 c 96 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The department of general administration was renamed the department of enterprise services by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.